Alaska statutes. Title 38. Public Land.
Chapter 08. Homesites.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 17, ch. 75, SLA 1987 provides that “[a] land management and disposal decision, including a disposal under AS

38.05.057

, AS 38.08, or AS 38.09, or a commercial agricultural project under AS

38.05.020(b)(6)

, made before June 16, 1987, under a classification order under AS

38.05.300

is valid, notwithstanding the adoption of the classification order before the adoption of the regional land use plan, if other requirements of law were met.”

Sec. 38.08.010.
Classification of land for homesite entry.

The director shall designate, classify, and make available for homesite entry state land in amounts and at times as required in AS

38.04.020

or as may otherwise be required by law.

Land classified as homesite entry land shall be divided into parcels not exceeding five acres in reasonably compact form, with boundaries conforming as nearly as practicable to natural geologic and topographic features. However, a parcel may exceed five acres if the director determines that the larger parcel is necessary to

comply with local zoning ordinances; or

permit the design of a subdivision because of topographical features, soil conditions, on-site sewage disposal requirements, or water drainage or supply considerations unique to the subdivision.

[Repealed, § 45 ch 85 SLA 1979.]

The director shall, to as great an extent as possible, classify land for homesite entry based upon the distribution of population in the state.

History.

(§ 2 ch 142 SLA 1977; am §§ 7, 8, 15 ch 181 SLA 1978; am § 45 ch 85 SLA 1979; am § 37 ch 113 SLA 1981)

Revisor’s notes. —

In the second sentence of subsection (b), the word “however” was added at the beginning of the sentence and “the” was substituted for “a” preceding “larger parcel” in 1981.

Administrative Code. —

For homesites, see 11 AAC 67, art. 5.

Opinions of attorney general. —

The state cannot use an application process for its disposal of land near the boundaries of a city that gives preference to that city’s residents with respect to lottery disposals under AS

38.05.057

and probably also cannot do so with respect to homesite disposals under this chapter.
July 15, 1985, Op. Att’y Gen.

Collateral references. —

73B C.J.S., Public Lands, §§ 63-71.

Sec. 38.08.020.
Public notice.

The director shall publish notice of the availability of the land in the same manner as provided in AS

38.05.945

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 142 SLA 1977; am § 9 ch 181 SLA 1978; am § 41 ch 85 SLA 1979; am § 104 ch 6 SLA 1984)

Sec. 38.08.030.
Applications for homesite entry; fees.

To qualify for a homesite entry permit, an applicant shall

at the time of application have attained the age of 18;

submit proof acceptable to the commissioner that the applicant is a resident of the state at the time of application, and that the applicant has been a resident of the state for not less than one year immediately preceding the date the application was submitted;

agree to comply with the requirements for obtaining a patent to land set out under AS

38.08.060

.

Fees for filing an application may not exceed $25.

History.

(§ 2 ch 142 SLA 1977; am § 10 ch 181 SLA 1978; am § 16 ch 67 SLA 1983; am § 29 ch 91 SLA 1997)

Administrative Code. —

For administrative provisions, see 11 AAC 67, art. 1.

For homesites, see 11 AAC 67, art. 5.

Sec. 38.08.040.
Issuance of entry permit.

An applicant meeting the qualifications for homesite entry under AS

38.08.030

and selected under (f) of this section shall be issued a revocable permit to occupy and improve the homesite in order to qualify for issuance of patent as provided in this chapter. The holder of a homesite entry permit shall pay, in advance, an annual rental fee of $100.

[Repealed, § 19 ch 67 SLA 1983.]

The permit may not be assigned, conveyed, or in any manner transferred except by testate or intestate succession, to a spouse during marriage, by order of a court as part of a divorce or dissolution of marriage settlement, or to either a member of the immediate family or a grantee of the applicant in the case of an extreme emergency or illness that disables the applicant. An attempt to assign, convey, transfer, or acquire a permit except as permitted by this subsection or by (e) of this section is void and constitutes a substantial breach of the permit.

An applicant may apply for more than one available homesite. Except as provided in (e) of this section,

a person holding a homesite patent may not apply for a homesite entry permit;

a person may not simultaneously hold more than one homesite entry permit; and

a person who is a member of the homesite entry permit holder’s household may not be issued a homesite entry permit while a member of the homesite entry permit holder’s household.

The limitations against applying for or holding a homesite patent or homesite entry permit set out in (c) and (d) of this section do not apply to a homesite patent or homesite entry permit

transferred by testate or intestate succession; or

transferred with the approval of the director in the case of an extreme emergency involving a person applying for or holding a patent or permit or in the case of an illness that disables the person.

If only one application for a homesite parcel is received, the commissioner shall offer an entry permit for the parcel to the applicant provided the applicant is otherwise qualified. If more than one application is received for a parcel, the commissioner shall select by lottery the applicant who is entitled to receive the permit for the parcel. The lottery shall be conducted under regulations adopted by the commissioner that are to the maximum extent practicable consistent with the provisions of AS

38.05.057

and the regulations adopted under that section.

History.

(§ 2 ch 142 SLA 1977; am § 39 ch 113 SLA 1981; am § 19 ch 67 SLA 1983; am § 50 ch 152 SLA 1984; am §§ 1 — 3 ch 35 SLA 1991; am §§ 30, 31 ch 91 SLA 1997)

Administrative Code. —

For sale or grant by lottery, see 11 AAC 67, art. 4.

For homesites, see 11 AAC 67, art. 5.

Sec. 38.08.050.
Revocation of entry permit.

The entry permit may only be revoked for failure to erect a dwelling as required under AS

38.08.060

, or for other substantial breach of the terms and conditions of the homesite entry permit.

Upon revocation and termination of a permit, improvements or chattels upon the homesite shall be managed, and subsequent issuance of a permit for entry on the homesite shall be conditioned, in the same manner as provided in AS

38.05.090

for removal or reversion of improvements upon termination of leases of state land.

History.

(§ 2 ch 142 SLA 1977)

Administrative Code. —

For homesites, see 11 AAC 67, art. 5.

Sec. 38.08.060.
Issuance of patent.

A person who enters upon homesite entry land under a permit issued by the director shall be issued a patent to the land conveying an unencumbered title if that person

occupies the land for a cumulative total of 35 months within the seven-year period following issuance of the homesite entry permit;

erects a habitable, permanent, single-family dwelling on the homesite, that meets all applicable state and local regulations, within five years of the date of issuance of the homesite entry permit; for the purposes of this paragraph, a mobile home is not considered to be a permanent dwelling unless it is placed on and permanently attached to a permanent foundation;

reimburses the state for the survey and platting undertaken in accordance with this chapter; the director shall provide by regulation for installment payments of this requirement.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to prohibit a person issued a homesite entry permit from residing in a temporary habitable dwelling on the homesite until revocation of the homesite entry permit.

Except as provided in (f) and (g) of this section, a person

may not be issued more than one patent during a lifetime;

who is a member of a patent holder’s household may not be issued a permit while a member of the patent holder’s household.

If a dwelling is found to have been substantially completed under AS

38.08.100

(1), patent shall be issued upon completion of the dwelling if that completion meets the requirements of AS

38.08.100

(2), notwithstanding (a)(2) of this section.

A permit holder who meets each of the provisions of (a) of this section except for (a)(1) and who tenders the commissioner an amount equal to five percent of the purchase price of the land within seven years of the issuance of the permit may purchase the land under AS

38.05.065

. The purchase price of the land is the fair market value of the land at the time of purchase.

Notwithstanding (c) of this section, an applicant who inherits the homesite entry permit of another applicant may

qualify under this section for each homesite entry;

use the efforts of the deceased applicant to qualify for the patent to the inherited entry; and

be issued a patent under this section.

The limitations against applying for or holding a homesite patent or homesite entry permit set out in this section do not apply to a homesite patent or permit

transferred by testate or intestate succession; or

transferred with the approval of the director in the case of an extreme emergency involving a person holding a patent or permit or in the case of an illness that disables the person.

History.

(§ 2 ch 142 SLA 1977; am § 11 ch 181 SLA 1978; am § 42 ch 85 SLA 1979; am § 38 ch 113 SLA 1981; am § 51 ch 152 SLA 1984; am §§ 4 — 7 ch 35 SLA 1991)

Administrative Code. —

For homesites, see 11 AAC 67, art. 5.

For installment contracts, see 11 AAC 67, art. 9.

Secs. 38.08.070 — 38.08.080.
Required planning authority and zoning approval of land within municipality. [Repealed, § 45 ch 85 SLA 1979.]

Sec. 38.08.090.
Disclaimer of intent to provide services. [Repealed, § 38 ch 91 SLA 1997.]

Sec. 38.08.100.
Revocation of entry permit.

The director may revoke a homesite entry permit for failure to

erect a dwelling in the time required under AS

38.08.060(a)(2)

unless the director finds that erection of the dwelling has been substantially completed and progress toward completion is being made at the expiration of the time required; or

convert a substantially completed dwelling for which an exception has been made under (1) of this section into a habitable permanent dwelling within one year after the deadline set out in AS

38.08.060(a)(2)

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 142 SLA 1977; am § 8 ch 35 SLA 1991)

Administrative Code. —

For homesites, see 11 AAC 67, art. 5.

Sec. 38.08.110.
Regulations.

The commissioner shall adopt regulations in accordance with AS

44.62.180

—

44.62.290

to carry out the purposes of this chapter, including, but not limited to, regulations relating to easements and access routes.

History.

(§ 2 ch 142 SLA 1977; am § 12 ch 181 SLA 1978)

Administrative Code. —

For appeals, see 11 AAC 2.

For fees for department services, see 11 AAC 5.

For administrative provisions, see 11 AAC 67, art. 1.

For sale or grant by lottery, see 11 AAC 67, art. 4.

For homesites, see 11 AAC 67, art. 5.

For definitions, see 11 AAC 67, art. 12.

For zoning district regulations, see 11 AAC 91, art. 2.

For designation of districts, see 11 AAC 91, art. 3.

Sec. 38.08.120.
Definitions.

In this chapter,

“commissioner” means the commissioner of natural resources;

“habitable dwelling” means a dwelling of a permanent nature, together with fixtures and facilities, including sanitary facilities, required or customary in the vicinity of the land made available for homesite entry;

“resident” means a person who is not claiming residence in another state and shows by all attending circumstances an intent to maintain a permanent residence in the state.

History.

(§ 2 ch 142 SLA 1977)